District of Columbia statutes.
5-113.06

Records open to public inspection.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the records to be kept by paragraphs (1), (2), and (4) of § 5-113.01 shall be open to public inspection when not in actual use, and this requirement shall be enforceable by mandatory injunction issued by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia on the application of any person.

(b)

The name, address, date of birth, occupation, and photograph of any person convicted of a violation of Chapter 27 of Title 22, shall be made available to the public upon written request, in exchange for a reasonable fee established by the Mayor or his or her designee.

(c)

Repealed.

History

R.S., D.C., § 389
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 99, ch. 159, title III, § 301(b)
Aug. 20, 1954, 68 Stat. 755, ch. 778, § 2
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(13)
Oct. 25, 1972, 86 Stat. 1108, Pub. L. 92-543, § 1
May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-130, § 2, 43 DCR 1570
July 25, 2006, D.C. Law 16-144, § 3, 53 DCR 2838
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-207, § 2, 59 DCR 12507

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-135.
1973 Ed., § 4-135.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-144, in subsec. (a), substituted “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the records” for “The records”; and added subsec. (c).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-207 repealed (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Safe Streets Anti-Prostitution Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-252, April 15, 1996, 43 DCR 2139).